North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 24. Conduct of Municipal Elections.

§ 163-291.
Partisan primaries and elections.

The nomination of candidates for office in cities, towns, villages, and special districts whose elections are conducted on a partisan basis shall be governed by the provisions of this Chapter applicable to the nomination of county officers, and the terms
“county board of elections,” “chairman of the county board of elections,” “county officers,” and similar terms shall be construed with respect to municipal elections to mean the appropriate municipal officers and candidates, except
that:

The dates of primary and election shall be as provided in

G.S. 163-279

.

A candidate seeking party nomination for municipal or district office shall file notice of candidacy with the board of elections no earlier than 12:00 noon on the first Friday in July and no later than 12:00 noon on the third Friday in July preceding
the election, except:

In the year following a federal decennial census, a candidate seeking party nomination for municipal or district office in any city which elects members of its governing board on a district basis, or requires that candidates reside in a district in order
to run, shall file his notice of candidacy with the board of elections no earlier than 12:00 noon on the fourth Monday in July and no later than 12:00 noon on the second Friday in August preceding the election; and

In the second year following a federal decennial census, if the election is held then under

G.S. 160A-23.1

, a candidate seeking party nomination for municipal or district office shall file his notice of candidacy with the board of elections at the same time as notices of candidacy for county officers are required
to be filed under

G.S. 163-106

.No person may file a notice of candidacy for more than one municipal office at the same election. If a person has filed a notice of candidacy for one office with the county board of elections under this
section, then a notice of candidacy may not later be filed for any other municipal office for that election unless the notice of candidacy for the first office is withdrawn first.

The filing fee for municipal and district primaries shall be fixed by the governing board not later than the day before candidates are permitted to begin filing notices of candidacy. There shall be a minimum filing fee of five dollars ($5.00). The governing
board shall have the authority to set the filing fee at not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than one percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought unless one percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought
is less than five dollars ($5.00), in which case the minimum filing fee of five dollars ($5.00) will be charged. The fee shall be paid to the board of elections at the time notice of candidacy is filed.

The municipal ballot may not be combined with any other ballot.

The canvass of the primary and second primary shall be held on the seventh day following the primary or second primary. In accepting the filing of complaints concerning the conduct of an election, a board of elections shall be subject to the rules concerning
Sundays and holidays set forth in

G.S. 103-5

.

Candidates having the right to demand a second primary shall do so not later than 12:00 noon on the Thursday following the canvass of the first primary.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 1973, c. 870, s. 1; 1975, c. 370, s. 2; 1983, c. 330, s. 2; 1985, c. 599, ss. 2, 3; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1012, s. 3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 553, s. 2; 1999-227, s. 5; 2003-278, s. 10(e), (f);
2006-192, s. 4; 2009-414, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

City of Albemarle: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 881, s. 4; (as to Art. 24) town of Walkertown: 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 936, as amended by 2019-61, s. 1; (As to Article 24) Charlotte-Mecklenburg Board of Education: 1993, c. 167, s. 1; Vance County Board
of Education: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 974, ss. 3, 4.

Instant Runoff Voting Pilot Program.

Session Laws 2006-192, s. 1(a) and (b), provides: “(a) The State Board of Elections shall select local jurisdictions in which to conduct a pilot program during the 2007 and 2008 elections for local offices using instant runoff voting. The State Board
shall select:

“(1) Up to 10 cities for the 2007 elections.

“(2) Up to 10 counties for the 2008 elections.

“In selecting those local jurisdictions, the State Board shall seek diversity of population size, regional location, and demographic composition. The pilot shall be conducted only with the concurrence of the county board of elections that conducts elections
for the local jurisdiction. If a city is selected that has voters in more than one county, the concurrence of all the county boards of elections that conduct that city’s elections is required. The pilot program shall consist of using
instant runoff voting as the method for determining the winner or winners of a partisan primary or a nonpartisan election that normally uses nonpartisan election and runoff or nonpartisan primary and election. Instant runoff voting
may also be used to determine results in an election where nonpartisan plurality elections are normally used, but only if the governing board of the local jurisdiction concurs.

“As used in this section, ‘instant runoff voting’ means a system in which voters rank up to three of the candidates by order of preference, first, second, or third. If the candidate with the most first-choice votes receives the threshold of victory of
the first-choice votes, that candidate wins. If no candidate receives the threshold of victory of first-choice votes, the two candidates with the greatest number of first-choice votes advance to a second round of counting. In this
round, each ballot counts as a vote for whichever of the two final candidates is ranked highest by the voter. The candidate with the most votes in the second round wins the election.

“The threshold of victory of first-choice votes for a partisan primary shall be forty percent (40%) plus one vote. The threshold of victory for a nonpartisan election and runoff or nonpartisan primary and election shall be a majority of the vote. The
threshold of victory in a contest that normally uses nonpartisan plurality shall be determined by the State Board with the concurrence of the county board of elections and the local governing board.

“If more than one seat is to be filled in the same race, the voter votes the same way as if one seat were to be filled. The counting is the same as when one seat is to be filled, with one or two rounds as needed, except that counting is done separately
for each seat to be filled. The first counting results in the first winner. Then the second count proceeds without the name of the first winner. This process results in the second winner. For each additional seat to be filled, an additional
count is done without the names of the candidates who have already won.

“Other details of instant runoff voting are as described in House Bill 1024 (First Edition) of the 2005 Regular Session of the General Assembly, with modifications the State Board deems necessary, in primaries and/or elections for city offices, for county
offices, or for both. Those modifications may include giving the voter more than three choices in case of multi-seat contests. The State Board shall not use instant runoff voting in a primary or election for an office unless the entire
electorate for the office uses the same method.

“(b) The State Board of Elections shall closely monitor the pilot program established in this section and report its findings and recommendations to the 2007 General Assembly.”

Session Laws 2008-150, s. 3(a), as amended by Session Laws 2009-541, s. 30(a), provides: “The State Board of Elections is authorized to select elections for offices of local government in which to use instant runoff voting in up to 10 local jurisdictions
in each of the following years: 2009, 2010, and 2011. The selection of jurisdictions and administration of instant runoff voting shall follow the provisions of Section 1(a) of Session Law 2006-192, except that the local governing board
that is the subject of the election must approve participation in the pilot and must hold at least one public hearing on the pilot before approving it, with notice of the hearing published at least 10 days before the hearing. The local
governing board also must agree to cooperate with the county board of elections and the Board in the development and implementation of a plan to educate candidates and voters about how to use the runoff voting method. In a multiseat
contest, the Board shall modify the method used for instant runoff voting in single-seat contests to apply its essential principles suitably to that election. In the case of a board of education election where the ‘local governing
board’ must be asked to authorize instant runoff voting because nonpartisan plurality elections are normally used, the ‘local governing board’ is the board of education itself. If instant runoff voting is used in place of the nonpartisan
election and runoff method as described in

G.S. 163-293

, the county board of elections, with the approval of the local governing board, may hold the election on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. The State Board of Elections, in consultation with the School
of Government at the University of North Carolina, shall by January 1, 2009, develop for the pilot program authorized in this section goals, standards consistent with general election law, and criteria for implementation and evaluation.
The pilot program shall be conducted according to those goals, standards, and criteria. The term ‘ranked choice voting’ shall have the same meaning as, and may be used as a substitute for, the term ‘instant runoff voting’ in describing
the pilot.”

Session Laws 2009-541, s. 30(b), provides: “This section is effective when it becomes law. The requirement for holding a public hearing applies only to primaries and elections held on and after January 1, 2010, but a local governing board may give notice
of and conduct a public hearing to satisfy the requirement before January 1, 2010.”

§ 163-292.
Determination of election results in cities using the plurality method.

In conducting nonpartisan elections and using the plurality method, elections shall be determined in accordance with the following rules:

When more than one person is seeking election to a single office, the candidate who receives the highest number of votes shall be declared elected.

When more persons are seeking election to two or more offices (constituting a group) than there are offices to be filled, those candidates receiving the highest number of votes, equal in number to the number of offices to be filled, shall be declared
elected.

If two or more candidates receiving the highest number of votes each receive the same number of votes, the board of elections shall determine the winner by lot.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-293.
Determination of election results in cities using the election and runoff election method.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, nonpartisan municipal elections in cities using the election and runoff election method shall be determined by a majority of the votes cast. A majority within the meaning of this section shall be determined
as follows:

When more than one person is seeking election to a single office, the majority shall be ascertained by dividing the total vote cast for all candidates by two. Any excess of the sum so ascertained shall be a majority, and the candidate who obtains a majority
shall be declared elected.

When more persons are seeking election to two or more offices (constituting a group) than there are offices to be filled, the majority shall be ascertained by dividing the total vote cast for all candidates by the number of offices to be filled, and by
dividing the result by two. Any excess of the sum so ascertained shall be a majority, and the candidates who obtain a majority shall be declared elected. If more candidates obtain a majority than there are offices to be
filled, those having the highest vote (equal to the number of offices to be filled) shall be declared elected.

If no candidate for a single office receives a majority of the votes cast, or if an insufficient number of candidates receives a majority of the votes cast for a group of offices, a runoff election shall be held as herein provided:

If no candidate for a single office receives a majority of the votes cast, the candidate receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected unless the candidate receiving the second highest number of votes requests a runoff election in accordance
with subsection (c) of this section. In the runoff election only the names of the two candidates who received the highest and next highest number of votes shall be printed on the ballot. No space for write-in votes shall
be included on the ballot for the runoff election.

If candidates for two or more offices (constituting a group) are to be selected and aspirants for some or all of the positions within the group do not receive a majority of the votes, those candidates equal in number to the positions remaining to be filled
and having the highest number of votes shall be declared elected unless some one or all of the candidates equal in number to the positions remaining to be filled and having the second highest number of votes shall request
a runoff election in accordance with subsection (c) of this section. In the runoff election to elect candidates for the positions in the group remaining to be filled, the names of all those candidates receiving the highest
number of votes and demanding a runoff election shall be printed on the ballot. No space for write-in votes shall be included on the ballot for the runoff election.

The canvass of the first election shall be held on the seventh day after the election. A candidate entitled to a runoff election may do so by filing a written request for a runoff election with the board of elections no later than 12:00 noon on the Thursday
after the result of the first election has been officially declared. In accepting the filing of complaints concerning the conduct of an election, a board of elections shall be subject to the rules concerning Sundays and holidays
set forth in

G.S. 103-5

.

Tie votes; how determined:

If there is a tie for the highest number of votes in a first election, the board of elections shall conduct a recount and declare the results. If the recount shows a tie vote, a runoff election between the two shall be held unless one of the candidates,
within three days after the result of the recount has been officially declared, files a written notice of withdrawal with the board of elections. Should that be done, the remaining candidate shall be declared elected.

If one candidate receives the highest number of votes cast in a first election, but short of a majority, and there is a tie between two or more of the other candidates receiving the second highest number of votes, the board of elections shall declare
the candidate having the highest number of votes to be elected, unless all but one of the tied candidates give written notice of withdrawal to the board of elections within three days after the result of the first election
has been officially declared. If all but one of the tied candidates withdraw within the prescribed three-day period, and the remaining candidate demands a runoff election in accordance with subsection (c) of this section,
a runoff election shall be held between the candidate who received the highest vote and the remaining candidate who received the second highest vote.

Runoff elections shall be held on the date fixed in G.S. 163-279(a)(4). Persons whose registrations become valid between the date of the first election and the runoff election shall be entitled to vote in the runoff election, but in all other respects
the runoff election shall be held under the laws, rules, and regulations provided for the first election.

A second runoff election shall not be held. The candidates receiving the highest number of votes in a runoff election shall be elected. If in a runoff election there is a tie for the highest number of votes between two candidates, the board of elections
shall determine the winner by lot.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 90; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 553, s. 3; 2003-278, s. 10(g); 2010-170, s. 15.5(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Jackson: 1991, c. 170, s. 1; city of Reidsville: 1993, c. 306, s. 2; McDowell County Board of Education: 1987, c. 322; Yancy County Board of Education: 1985, c. 135; 2017-78, ss. 10.1, 10.2.

§ 163-294.
Determination of election results in cities using nonpartisan primaries.

In cities whose elections are nonpartisan and who use the nonpartisan primary and election method, there shall be a primary to narrow the field of candidates to two candidates for each position to be filled if, when the filing period closes, there are
more than two candidates for a single office or the number of candidates for a group of offices exceeds twice the number of positions to be filled. If only one or two candidates file for a single office, no primary shall be held
for that office and the candidates shall be declared nominated. If the number of candidates for a group of offices does not exceed twice the number of positions to be filled, no primary shall be held for those offices and the candidates
shall be declared nominated.

In the primary, the two candidates for a single office receiving the highest number of votes, and those candidates for a group of offices receiving the highest number of votes, equal to twice the number of positions to be filled, shall be declared nominated.
In both the primary and election, a voter should not mark more names for any office than there are positions to be filled by election. If two or more candidates receiving the highest number of votes each received the same number
of votes, the board of elections shall determine their relative ranking by lot, and shall declare the nominees accordingly. The canvass of the primary shall be held on the seventh day following the primary. In accepting the filing
of complaints concerning the conduct of an election, a board of elections shall be subject to the rules concerning Sundays and holidays set forth in

G.S. 103-5

.

In the election, the names of those candidates declared nominated without a primary and those candidates nominated in the primary shall be placed on the ballot. The candidate for a single office receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected.
Those candidates for a group of offices receiving the highest number of votes, equal in number to the number of positions to be filled, shall be elected. If two candidates receiving the highest number of votes each received the
same number of votes, the board of elections shall determine the winner by lot.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 1991, c. 341, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 553, s. 4; 2001-460, s. 6; 2003-278, s. 10(h); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-294.1.
Death of candidates or elected officers.

This section shall apply only to municipal and special district elections.

If a candidate for political party nomination for office dies, becomes disqualified, or withdraws before the primary but after the ballots have been printed, the provisions of

G.S. 163-112

shall govern.If a candidate for nomination in a nonpartisan municipal primary dies, becomes disqualified, or withdraws before the primary but after the ballots have been printed, the board of elections shall determine
whether or not there is time to reprint the ballots. If the board determines that there is not enough time to reprint the ballots, the deceased or disqualified candidate’s name shall remain on the ballots. If he receives enough
votes for nomination, such votes shall be disregarded and the candidate receiving the next highest number of votes below the number necessary for nomination shall be declared nominated. If the death or disqualification of the candidate
leaves only two candidates for each office to be filled, the nonpartisan primary shall not be held and all candidates shall be declared nominees.If a nominee for political party nomination dies, becomes disqualified, or withdraws
after the primary and before election day, the provisions of

G.S. 163-114

shall govern.If a candidate in a nonpartisan election dies, becomes disqualified, or withdraws before election day and after the ballots have been printed, the board of elections shall determine whether there is
enough time to reprint the ballots. If there is not enough time to reprint the ballots, and should the deceased or disqualified candidate receive enough votes to be elected, the board of elections shall declare the office vacant,
and it shall be filled as provided by law.

If a person elected to any city office dies, becomes disqualified, or resigns on or after election day and before he has qualified by taking the oath of office, the office shall be deemed vacant, and shall be filled as provided by law.

A vacancy that occurs in a municipal or special district elective office shall be filled by the governing body as provided in

G.S. 160A-63

. In the case of a special district, the words “city council” as used in

G.S. 160A-63

, shall mean the governing body of the special district.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 1985, c. 619; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-294.2.
Notice of candidacy and filing fee in nonpartisan municipal elections.

Each person offering himself as a candidate for election to any municipal office in municipalities whose elections are nonpartisan shall do so by filing a notice of candidacy with the board of elections in the following form, inserting the words in parentheses
when appropriate:

Click to view

The notice of candidacy shall be either signed in the presence of the chairman or secretary of the board of elections or the director of elections of that county, or signed and acknowledged before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments who shall
certify the notice under seal. An acknowledged and certified notice may be mailed to the board of elections. The candidate shall sign the notice of candidacy with his legal name and, in his discretion, any nickname by which
he is commonly known, in the form that he wishes it to appear upon the ballot but substantially as follows: “Richard D. (Dick) Roc.” A candidate may also, in lieu of his legal first name and legal middle initial or middle name
(if any) sign his nickname, provided that he appends to the notice of candidacy an affidavit that he has been commonly known by that nickname for at least five years prior to the date of making the affidavit, and notwithstanding
the previous sentence, if the candidate has used his nickname in lieu of first and middle names as permitted by this sentence, unless another candidate for the same office who files a notice of candidacy has the same last name,
the nickname shall be printed on the ballot immediately before the candidate’s surname but shall not be enclosed by parentheses. If another candidate for the same office who filed a notice of candidacy has the same last name,
then the candidate’s name shall be printed on the ballot in accordance with the next sentence of this subsection. The candidate shall also include with the affidavit the way his name (as permitted by law) should be listed on
the ballot if another candidate with the same last name files a notice of candidacy for that office.

Only persons who are registered to vote in the municipality shall be permitted to file notice of candidacy for election to municipal office. The board of elections shall inspect the voter registration lists immediately upon receipt of the notice of candidacy
and shall cancel the notice of candidacy of any candidate who is not eligible to vote in the election. The board shall give notice of cancellation to any candidate whose notice of candidacy has been cancelled under this subsection
by mail or by having the notice served on him by the county sheriff.

Candidates seeking municipal office shall file their notices of candidacy with the board of elections no earlier than 12:00 noon on the first Friday in July and no later than 12:00 noon on the third Friday in July preceding the election, except:

In the year following a federal decennial census, candidates seeking municipal office in any city which elects members of its governing board on a district basis, or requires that candidates reside in a district in order to run, shall file their notices
of candidacy with the board of elections no earlier than 12:00 noon on the fourth Monday in July and no later than 12:00 noon on the second Friday in August preceding the election; and

In the second year following a federal decennial census, if the election is held then under

G.S. 160A-23.1

, candidates seeking municipal office shall file their notices of candidacy with the board of elections at the same time as notices of candidacy for county officers are required to be filed under

G.S. 163-106

.Notices of candidacy which are mailed must be received by the board of elections before the filing deadline regardless of the time they were deposited in the mails.

Any person may withdraw his notice of candidacy at any time prior to the close of business on the third business day prior to the filing deadline prescribed in subsection (c), and shall be entitled to a refund of his filing fee if he does so.

The filing fee for the primary or election shall be fixed by the governing board not later than the day before candidates are permitted to begin filing notices of candidacy. There shall be a minimum filing fee of five dollars ($5.00). The governing board
shall have the authority to set the filing fee at not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than one percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought unless one percent (1%) of the annual salary of the office sought is
less than five dollars ($5.00), in which case the minimum filing fee of five dollars ($5.00) will be charged. The fee shall be paid to the board of elections at the time notice of candidacy is filed.

No person may file a notice of candidacy for more than one municipal office at the same election. If a person has filed a notice of candidacy for one office with the board of elections under this section, then a notice of candidacy may not later be filed
for any other municipal office for the election unless the notice of candidacy for the first office is withdrawn first.

“Date ; I hereby file notice that I am a candidate for election to the office of (at large) (for the Ward) in the regular municipal election to be held in on , (municipality) Signed (Name of Candidate) Witness: For the Board of Elections’’

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 1973, c. 870, s. 2; 1975, c. 370, s. 2; 1977, c. 265, s. 18; 1981, c. 32, s. 3; 1983, c. 330, s. 3; c. 644, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 472, s. 5; c. 558, s. 3; c. 599, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1012,
s. 4; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1999-227, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 59; 2006-192, s. 5; 2009-414, s. 3; 2013-381, s. 21.2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Bethel, Greenville, Farmville, and Newport: 1997-414; Polk: 1983, c. 744, s. 1.1; city of Roanoke Rapids: 1997-101; city of Trinity: 1997-44, s. 5; town of Biltmore Forest: 2019-27, s. 2(b); town of Black Mountain: 2019-27, s. 1(b); town of Calabash:
1989, c. 593, s. 6; town of Mills River: 2003-242, s. 3; town of Montreat: 2019-28, s. 1(b); town of Rimertown: 1999-284, s. 5.1(b); town of Ronda: 2019-27, s. 3(a); Grandfather village: 1987, c. 419, s. 4; municipalities in Lee County:
1997-449, s. 1

§ 163-294.3.
Sole candidates to be voted upon in nonpartisan municipal elections.

Each candidate for municipal office in nonpartisan municipal elections shall be voted upon, even though only one candidate has filed or has been nominated for a given office, in order that the voters may have the opportunity to cast write-in votes under
the general election laws.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-294.4.
Failure of candidates to file; death of a candidate before election.

If in a nonpartisan municipal election, when the filing period expires, candidates have not filed for all offices to be filled, the board of elections may extend the filing period for five days.

If at the time the filing period closes only two persons have filed notice of candidacy for election to a single office or only as many persons have filed notices of candidacy for group offices as there are offices to be filled, and thereafter one of
the candidates dies before the election and before the ballots are printed, the board of elections shall, upon notification of the death, immediately reopen the filing period for an additional five days during which time additional
candidates shall be permitted to file for election. If the ballots have been printed at the time the board of elections receives notice of the candidate’s death, the board shall determine whether there will be sufficient time to
reprint them before the election if the filing period is reopened for three days. If the board determines that there will be sufficient time to reprint the ballots, it shall reopen the filing period for three days to allow other
candidates to file for election.

If the ballots have been printed at the time the board of elections receives notice of a candidate’s death, and if the board determines that there is not enough time to reprint the ballots before the election if the filing period is reopened for three
days, then, regardless of the number of candidates remaining for the office, the ballots shall not be reprinted and the name of the deceased candidate shall remain on the ballots. If a deceased candidate should poll the highest
number of votes in the election, even though short of a majority the board of elections shall declare the office vacant and it shall be filled in the manner provided by law. If no candidate in an election receives a majority of
the votes cast and the second highest vote is cast for a deceased candidate, no runoff election shall be held, but the board of elections shall declare the candidate receiving the highest vote to be elected.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-295.
Municipal and special district elections; application of this Chapter 163.

To the extent that the laws, rules and procedures applicable to the conduct of primary, general or special elections by county boards of elections under Articles 3, 4, 5, 6, 7A, 8, 9, 10, 11, 11B, 12, 19 and 22 of this Chapter are not inconsistent with
the provisions of this Article, those laws, rules and procedures shall apply to municipal and special district elections and their conduct by the board of elections conducting those elections. The State Board of Elections shall have
the same authority over all such elections as it has over county and State elections under those Articles.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 91; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 68; 2006-155, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-296.
Nomination by petition.

In cities conducting partisan elections, any qualified voter who seeks to have his name printed on the regular municipal election ballot as an unaffiliated candidate may do so in the manner provided in

G.S. 163-122

, except that the petitions and affidavits shall be filed not later than 12:00 noon on the Friday preceding the seventh Saturday before the election, and the petitions shall be signed by a number of qualified voters of
the municipality equal to at least one and a half percent (1.5%) of the whole number of voters qualified to vote in the municipal election according to the voter registration records of the State Board of Elections as of January 1
of the year in which the general municipal election is held. A person whose name appeared on the ballot in a primary election is not eligible to have his name placed on the regular municipal election ballot as an unaffiliated candidate
for the same office in that year. The Board of Elections shall examine and verify the signatures on the petition, and shall certify only the names of signers who are found to be qualified registered voters in the municipality. Provided
that in the case where a qualified voter seeks to have his name printed on the regular municipal election ballot as an unaffiliated candidate for election from an election district within the municipality, the petition shall be signed
by one and a half percent (1.5%) of the voters qualified to vote for that office.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 1979, c. 23, ss. 2, 4, 5; c. 534, ss. 3, 4; 1989, c. 402; 1991, c. 297, s. 2; 2004-127, s. 8(b); 2006-264, s. 21; 2017-6, s. 3; 2017-214, s. 2(b); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Cleveland: 2017-78, s. 3.3, as added by 2017-200, s. 2 (for the 2017 elections for the Cleveland County Board of Education).

§ 163-297.
Structure at voting place; marking off limits of voting place.

Precincts in which municipal primaries and elections are conducted shall conform, in all regards, to the requirements stipulated in

G.S. 163-129

and all other provisions contained in this Chapter relating to county and State elections.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-298.
Municipal primaries and elections.

The phrases “county board of elections,” and “chairman of the board of elections” as used in this Article, with respect to all municipal primaries and elections, shall mean the county board of elections and its chairman in all municipalities. The words
“general election,” as used in this Article, shall include regular municipal elections, runoff elections, and nonpartisan primaries, except where specific provision is made for municipal elections and nonpartisan primaries.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 2011-31, s. 21; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-299.
Ballots; municipal primaries and elections.

The ballots printed for use in general and special elections under the provisions of this Article shall contain:

The names of all candidates who have been put in nomination in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter by any political party recognized in this State, or, in nonpartisan municipal elections, the names of all candidates who have filed notices of
candidacy or who have been nominated in a nonpartisan primary.

The names of all persons who have qualified as unaffiliated candidates under the provisions of

G.S. 163-296

.

All questions, issues and propositions to be voted on by the people.

The form of municipal ballots to be used in partisan municipal elections shall be the same as the form prescribed in this Chapter for the county ballot.

The names of candidates for nomination or election in municipal primaries or elections shall be placed on the ballot in strict alphabetical order, unless the municipal governing body has adopted a resolution no later than 60 days prior to a primary or
election requesting that candidates’ names be rotated on ballots. In the event such a resolution has been adopted, then the board of elections responsible for printing the ballots shall have them printed so that the name of each
candidate shall, as far as practicable, occupy alternate positions on the ballot; to that end the name of each candidate shall occupy with reference to the name of every other candidate for the same office, first position, second
position and every other position, if any, upon an equal number of ballots, and the ballots shall be distributed among the precinct voting places impartially and without discrimination.

The provisions of Articles 14A and 15A of this Chapter shall apply to ballots used in municipal primaries and elections in the same manner as it is applied to county ballots.

The rules contained in

G.S. 163-182.1

and

G.S. 163-182.2

for counting primary ballots shall be followed in counting ballots in municipal primaries and nonpartisan primaries.

The requirements contained in G.S. 163-182.2(b) shall apply to all municipal elections.

The county board of elections shall, in addition to the requirements contained in

G.S. 163-182.5

canvass the results in a nonpartisan municipal primary, election or runoff election, and in a special district election, the number of legal votes cast in each precinct for each candidate, the name of each person
voted for, and the total number of votes cast in the municipality or special district for each person for each different office.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 1979, c. 534, s. 4; c. 806; 2001-398, ss. 10 - 12; 2001-460, ss. 7, 8; 2004-127, s. 5; 2011-31, s. 22; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-300.
Disposition of duplicate abstracts in municipal elections.

Within nine days after a primary or election is held in any municipality, the chairman of the county board of elections shall mail to the chairman of the State Board of Elections, the duplicate abstract prepared in accordance with

G.S. 163-182.6

. One copy shall be retained by the county board of elections as a permanent record and one copy shall be filed with the city clerk.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 2001-398, s. 13; 2003-278, s. 10(i); 2011-31, s. 23; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-301.
Chairman of election board to furnish certificate of elections.

Not earlier than five days nor later than 10 days after the results of any municipal election have been officially determined and published in accordance with

G.S. 163-182.5

, the chairman of the county board of elections shall issue certificates of election, under the hand and seal of the chairman, to all municipal and special district officers. In issuing such certificates of election the
chairman shall be restricted by the provisions of

G.S. 163-182.14

.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 2001-398, s. 14; 2011-31, s. 24; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).